Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3705
Committee,
defined.

Committee means the
visitors committee appointed as provided in section 81-3717 for
the purpose of advising the county board in administering the County Visitors
Promotion Fund and the County Visitors Improvement Fund established pursuant
to such section and carrying out the
purposes of the Nebraska Visitors Development Act.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 7;

Laws 1988, LB 797, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 262, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 81-1251;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 5.